North Dakota, session 69, HB1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 24-02-37 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
3. The state treasurer shall deposit the moneys in the state highway fund in an interest-bearing
account at the Bank of North Dakota. The state treasurer shall deposit eighty percent of the
income derived from the interest-bearing account in a special interest-bearing account in the
state treasury known as the special road fund. The special road fund may be used, within the
limits of legislative appropriation, exclusively for the construction and maintenance of access
roads to and roads within recreational, tourist, and historical areas as designated by the
special road committee. A political subdivision, tribal government, or state agency may request
funds from the special road fund by applying to the committee on forms designated by the
committee. The committee may require the political subdivision, tribal government, or state
agency to contribute to the cost of the project as a condition of any expenditure authorized
from the special road fund. Any moneys in the fund not obligated by the special road
committee by June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year must be held for an additional two
years after which the funds revert to the state highway fund.

H. B. NO. 1051 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1051.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State